Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Quarter Horse and Appaloosa Racing

230.443.
Horses conceived by artificial insemination or other means eligible to race.

Quarter horses, paint horses, Appaloosas, and Arabian horses conceived by artificial insemination or other means shall be eligible to race under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 206, § 11; 1972, ch. 376, § 9; 1984, ch. 222, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 296, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 109, § 33, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 173, § 1, effective April 22, 2004; 2004, ch. 191, § 54, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 234, § 1, effective April 22, 2006; 2015 ch. 47, § 8, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/22/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 234, sec. 4, provides that the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known as the “2006 Kentucky Equine Competitiveness Act.”

230.445.
Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian development fund — Contributions — Purposes — Distribution — Administrative regulations.

There is hereby created a trust and revolving fund for the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission designated the Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian development fund, consisting of money allocated to the fund under KRS

230.3771

together with any other money contributed to or allocated to the fund from all other sources. For the purposes of this section, “development fund” or “fund” means the Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian development fund. Money to the credit of the development fund shall be distributed by the Treasurer for the purposes provided in this section, upon authorization of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission and upon approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, money to the credit of the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward in the fund to the succeeding fiscal year. Interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse. Moneys in the fund shall be used and are hereby appropriated for purposes specified in this section.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall use the development fund to promote races and to provide purses for races for horses bred and foaled in the Commonwealth. The commission shall provide for distribution of money to the credit of the development fund to persons, corporations, or associations operating licensed tracks within Kentucky conducting quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian horse racing, on an equitable basis as determined by the commission and in conformance with subsection (3) of this section.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall:

Fix the amount of money to be paid from the development fund to be added to the purse provided for each race by the licensed operator of the track;

Fix the dates and conditions of races to be held by licensed tracks; and

Promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Money from the fund shall be allocated to each breed of horse represented in the fund in an amount equal to the amount the breed has contributed to the fund.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall appoint qualified personnel as necessary to:

Supervise registration of, or determine the eligibility of, horses entitled to entry in races which receive a portion of purse money from the development fund; and

Assist the commission in determining the conditions, class, and quality of the fund-supported race program established to carry out the purposes of this section.

The personnel shall serve at the pleasure of the commission and compensation shall be fixed by the commission with the compensation and necessary expenses of the personnel paid from the development fund.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of this section and shall administer the Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian development fund in a manner designed to:

Promote and aid in the development of the horse industry in Kentucky;

Upgrade the quality of racing in Kentucky; and

Improve the quality of horses bred in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 57, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 47, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). References to the “Kentucky Horse Racing Authority” and “authority” in this section, as created by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 57, sec. 4, have been changed in codification to the “Kentucky Horse Racing Commission” and “commission” to reflect the reorganization of certain parts of the Executive Branch, as set forth in Executive Order 2009-535 and confirmed by the General Assembly in 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24. These changes were made by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 1938.

230.446.
Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian purse fund — Purposes — Distribution and allocation of funds — Administration of fund by Kentucky Horse Racing Commission.

The Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian purse fund is created as a trust and agency fund to be administered by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission and shall consist of moneys allocated to the fund under KRS

230.3771

together with any other moneys contributed to or allocated to the fund from all other sources. For the purposes of this section, “purse fund” or “fund” means the Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian purse fund.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, money to the credit of the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward in the fund to the succeeding fiscal year. Interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys in the fund shall be used and are hereby appropriated for purposes specified in this section.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall use the purse fund to promote racing and to provide purses for races conducted in the Commonwealth as follows:

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall provide for distribution of money from the fund to persons, corporations, or associations operating licensed tracks within the Commonwealth conducting quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian horse racing;

Moneys from the purse fund shall be allocated to each breed of horse represented in the fund in proportion to the amount each breed has contributed to the fund; and

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall consult with the Kentucky Quarter Horse Racing Association or its successor, the Kentucky Appaloosa Owners Association or its successor, the Kentucky Paint Horse Club or its successor, and the Kentucky Arabian Horse Association or its successor, to designate the races and the amount of purse money to be provided for designated races for each breed respectively.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall:

Fix the dates and conditions of races to be held by licensed tracks;

Fix the amount of money to be paid from the fund to be added to the purse provided for each race by the licensed operator of the track; and

Promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall carry out the provisions of this section and administer the purse fund in a manner designed to promote and aid in the development of the horse industry in Kentucky and upgrade the quality of horse racing in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 21, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 47, § 3, effective June 24, 2015.

230.447.
Wagering governed by regulations. [Repealed.]

230.510.
Kentucky horse council established — Membership — Officers — Oath — Offices — Meetings — Compensation. [Repealed.]

230.520.
Duties. [Repealed.]